Maryland, session 2026, SB0621.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
6–206.
(a) (1) (i) To protect life and property from the hazards of fire and
explosion, the Commission shall adopt comprehensive regulations as a State Fire
Prevention Code.
(ii) The State Fire Prevention Code shall comply with standard safe
practice as embodied in widely recognized standards of good practice for fire prevention and
fire protection.
(iii) The State Fire Prevention Code has the force and effect of law in
the political subdivisions of the State.
(2) (i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, the
regulations adopted under this subsection do not apply to existing installations, plants, or
equipment.
(ii) If the Commission determines that an installation, plant, or
equipment is a hazard so [inimicable] HARMFUL to the public safety as to require
correction, the regulations adopted under this subsection apply to the installation, plant,
or equipment.
– 1 –

Ch. 67 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) REGULATIONS ADOPTED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL:
(I) INCORPORATE BY REFERENCE SECTIONS 30.7.5 AND 31.7.5
OF THE NATIONAL FIRE PROTECTION ASSOCIATION 101 LIFE SAFETY CODE (2024
EDITION); AND
(II) PERMIT TRASH AND RECYCLING MATERIALS AWAITING
SCHEDULED COLLECTION TO BE PLACED IN CORRIDORS AND EXITS IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THE PROVISIONS DESCRIBED IN ITEM (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is an emergency
measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has
been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to
each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take effect from the date it is
enacted.
Approved by the Governor, April 14, 2026.
– 2 –